test/src/gt-desc-yamls/case-endings-stem-change_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:

  # Nouns with stem-changes

  Stem-change nouns ending in a consonant cluster:
    # Singular
    nís+N+Sing: nís
    nís+N+Sing+Nom: nís
    nís+N+Sing+Acc: nís
    nís+N+Sing+Gen: nisso
    nís+N+Sing+Ins: nissenen
    nís+N+Sing+All: nissenna
    nís+N+Sing+Dat: nissen
    nís+N+Sing+Loc: nissesse
    nís+N+Sing+Loc+Short: nisses
    nís+N+Sing+Abl: nissello
    nís+N+Sing+Poss: nisse{w}a
    # Dual
    nís+N+Dual: [nisset, nissu]
    nís+N+Dual+Nom: [nisset, nissu]
    nís+N+Dual+Acc: [nisset, nissu]
    nís+N+Dual+Gen: [nisseto, nissuo]
    nís+N+Dual+Ins: [nissenten, nissunen]
    nís+N+Dual+All: [nissenta, nissunna]
    nís+N+Dual+Dat: [nissent, nissun, nissuen]
    nís+N+Dual+Loc: [nissetse, nissusse]
    nís+N+Dual+Loc+Short: nissus  # also nisstes ???
    nís+N+Dual+Abl: [nisselto, nissullo]
    nís+N+Dual+Poss: ['nisset{w}a', 'nissu{w}a']
    # Plural
    nís+N+Plur: nissi
    nís+N+Plur+Nom: nissi
    nís+N+Plur+Acc: nissi
    nís+N+Plur+Gen: nission
    nís+N+Plur+Ins: nissinen
    nís+N+Plur+All: nissinnar
    nís+N+Plur+Dat: nissin
    nís+N+Plur+Loc: nississen
    nís+N+Plur+Loc+Short: nissis
    nís+N+Plur+Abl: [nissillon, nissillor]
    nís+N+Plur+Poss: nissi{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    nís+N+Plur+Par: nisseli
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Nom: nisseli
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Acc: nisseli
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Gen: nisselion
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Ins: nisselínen
    nís+N+Plur+Par+All: [nisselinnar, nisselinna]
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Dat: nisselin
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [nisselissen, nisselisse]
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: nisselis
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [nisselillon, nisselillor, nisselillo]
    nís+N+Plur+Par+Poss: nisselí{w}a
  
  Stem-change nouns where the change is non-final:
    # Singular
    nér+N+Sing: nér
    nér+N+Sing+Nom: nér
    nér+N+Sing+Acc: nér
    nér+N+Sing+Gen: nero
    nér+N+Sing+Ins: nernen
    nér+N+Sing+All: nerenna
    nér+N+Sing+Dat: neren
    nér+N+Sing+Loc: neresse
    nér+N+Sing+Loc+Short: neres
    nér+N+Sing+Abl: nerello
    nér+N+Sing+Poss: ner{w}a
    # Dual
    nér+N+Dual: [neret, neru]
    nér+N+Dual+Nom: [neret, neru]
    nér+N+Dual+Acc: [neret, neru]
    nér+N+Dual+Gen: [nerto, neruo]
    nér+N+Dual+Ins: [nerenten, nerunen]
    nér+N+Dual+All: [nerenta, nerunna]
    nér+N+Dual+Dat: [nerent, nerun, neruen]
    nér+N+Dual+Loc: [neretse, nerusse]
    nér+N+Dual+Loc+Short: nerus  # also nertes ???
    nér+N+Dual+Abl: [nerelto, nerullo]
    nér+N+Dual+Poss: ['neret{w}a', 'neru{w}a']
    # Plural
    nér+N+Plur: neri
    nér+N+Plur+Nom: neri
    nér+N+Plur+Acc: neri
    nér+N+Plur+Gen: nerion
    nér+N+Plur+Ins: nerinen
    nér+N+Plur+All: nerinnar
    nér+N+Plur+Dat: nerin
    nér+N+Plur+Loc: nerissen
    nér+N+Plur+Loc+Short: neris
    nér+N+Plur+Abl: [nerillon, nerillor]
    nér+N+Plur+Poss: neri{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    nér+N+Plur+Par: nelli
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Nom: nelli
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Acc: nelli
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Gen: nellion
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Ins: nellínen
    nér+N+Plur+Par+All: [nellinnar, nellinna]
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Dat: nellin
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [nellissen, nellisse]
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: nellis
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [nellillon, nellillor, nellillo]
    nér+N+Plur+Par+Poss: nellí{w}a
  
  # Stem-change nouns ending in o/u

  Stem-change nouns ending in co/cu- (also shifts to qu):
    # Singular
    ranco+N+Sing: ranco
    ranco+N+Sing+Nom: ranco
    ranco+N+Sing+Acc: ranco
    ranco+N+Sing+Gen: ranquo
    ranco+N+Sing+Ins: rancunen
    ranco+N+Sing+All: rancunna
    ranco+N+Sing+Dat: rancun
    ranco+N+Sing+Loc: rancusse
    ranco+N+Sing+Loc+Short: rancus
    ranco+N+Sing+Abl: rancullo
    ranco+N+Sing+Poss: rancu{w}a
    # Dual
    ranco+N+Dual: [rancut, rancu]
    ranco+N+Dual+Nom: [rancut, rancu]
    ranco+N+Dual+Acc: [rancut, rancu]
    ranco+N+Dual+Gen: [rancuto, ranquo]
    ranco+N+Dual+Ins: [rancunten, rancunen]
    ranco+N+Dual+All: [rancunta, rancunna]
    ranco+N+Dual+Dat: [rancunt, rancun, ranquen]
    ranco+N+Dual+Loc: [rancutse, rancusse]
    ranco+N+Dual+Loc+Short: rancus  # also rancutes ???
    ranco+N+Dual+Abl: [ranculto, rancullo]
    ranco+N+Dual+Poss: ['rancut{w}a', 'rancu{w}a']
    # Plural
    ranco+N+Plur: ranqui
    ranco+N+Plur+Nom: ranqui
    ranco+N+Plur+Acc: ranqui
    ranco+N+Plur+Gen: ranquion
    ranco+N+Plur+Ins: ranquinen
    ranco+N+Plur+All: ranquinnar
    ranco+N+Plur+Dat: ranquin
    ranco+N+Plur+Loc: ranquissen
    ranco+N+Plur+Loc+Short: ranquis
    ranco+N+Plur+Abl: [ranquillon, ranquillor]
    ranco+N+Plur+Poss: ranqui{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    ranco+N+Plur+Par: ranculi
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Nom: ranculi
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Acc: ranculi
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Gen: ranculion
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Ins: ranculínen
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+All: [ranculinnar, ranculinna]
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Dat: ranculin
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [ranculissen, ranculisse]
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: ranculis
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [ranculillon, ranculillor, ranculillo]
    ranco+N+Plur+Par+Poss: ranculí{w}a

  Stem-change nouns ending in go/gu- (also shifts to gw):
    # Singular
    ango+N+Sing: ango
    ango+N+Sing+Nom: ango
    ango+N+Sing+Acc: ango
    ango+N+Sing+Gen: angwo
    ango+N+Sing+Ins: angunen
    ango+N+Sing+All: angunna
    ango+N+Sing+Dat: angun
    ango+N+Sing+Loc: angusse
    ango+N+Sing+Loc+Short: angus
    ango+N+Sing+Abl: angullo
    ango+N+Sing+Poss: angu{w}a
    # Dual
    ango+N+Dual: [angut, angu]
    ango+N+Dual+Nom: [angut, angu]
    ango+N+Dual+Acc: [angut, angu]
    ango+N+Dual+Gen: [anguto, angwo]
    ango+N+Dual+Ins: [angunten, angunen]
    ango+N+Dual+All: [angunta, angunna]
    ango+N+Dual+Dat: [angunt, angun, angwen]
    ango+N+Dual+Loc: [angutse, angusse]
    ango+N+Dual+Loc+Short: angus  # also angutes ???
    ango+N+Dual+Abl: [angulto, angullo]
    ango+N+Dual+Poss: ['angut{w}a', 'angu{w}a']
    # Plural
    ango+N+Plur: angwi
    ango+N+Plur+Nom: angwi
    ango+N+Plur+Acc: angwi
    ango+N+Plur+Gen: angwion
    ango+N+Plur+Ins: angwinen
    ango+N+Plur+All: angwinnar
    ango+N+Plur+Dat: angwin
    ango+N+Plur+Loc: angwissen
    ango+N+Plur+Loc+Short: angwis
    ango+N+Plur+Abl: [angwillon, angwillor]
    ango+N+Plur+Poss: angwi{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    ango+N+Plur+Par: anguli
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Nom: anguli
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Acc: anguli
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Gen: angulion
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Ins: angulínen
    ango+N+Plur+Par+All: [angulinnar, angulinna]
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Dat: angulin
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [angulissen, angulisse]
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: angulis
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [angulillon, angulillor, angulillo]
    ango+N+Plur+Par+Poss: angulí{w}a
  
  # Stem-change nouns ending in e/i

  Stem-change nouns ending in e/i-:
    # Singular
    súrë+N+Sing: súre
    súrë+N+Sing+Nom: súre
    súrë+N+Sing+Acc: súre
    súrë+N+Sing+Gen: súrio
    súrë+N+Sing+Ins: súrinen
    súrë+N+Sing+All: súrinna
    súrë+N+Sing+Dat: súrin
    súrë+N+Sing+Loc: súrisse
    súrë+N+Sing+Loc+Short: súris
    súrë+N+Sing+Abl: súrillo
    súrë+N+Sing+Poss: súri{w}a
    # Dual
    súrë+N+Dual: [súrit, súru]
    súrë+N+Dual+Nom: [súrit, súru]
    súrë+N+Dual+Acc: [súrit, súru]
    súrë+N+Dual+Gen: [súrito, súruo]
    súrë+N+Dual+Ins: [súrinten, súrunen]
    súrë+N+Dual+All: [súrinta, súrunna]
    súrë+N+Dual+Dat: [súrint, súrun, súruen]
    súrë+N+Dual+Loc: [súritse, súrusse]
    súrë+N+Dual+Loc+Short: súrus  # also súrites ???
    súrë+N+Dual+Abl: [súrilto, súrullo]
    súrë+N+Dual+Poss: ['súrit{w}a', 'súru{w}a']
    # Plural
    súrë+N+Plur: súrir
    súrë+N+Plur+Nom: súrir
    súrë+N+Plur+Acc: súrir
    súrë+N+Plur+Gen: súriron
    súrë+N+Plur+Ins: [súrinen, súrínen]
    súrë+N+Plur+All: súrinnar
    súrë+N+Plur+Dat: [súrin, súrín]
    súrë+N+Plur+Loc: súrissen
    súrë+N+Plur+Loc+Short: [súris, súrís]
    súrë+N+Plur+Abl: [súrillon, súrillor]
    súrë+N+Plur+Poss: ['súri{w}a', 'súrí{w}a']
    # Partitive Plural
    súrë+N+Plur+Par: súrili
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Nom: súrili
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Acc: súrili
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Gen: súrilion
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Ins: súrilínen
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+All: [súrilinnar, súrilinna]
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Dat: súrilin
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [súrilissen, súrilisse]
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: súrilis
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [súrilillon, súrilillor, súrilillo]
    súrë+N+Plur+Par+Poss: súrilí{w}a
